Utah statutes.
70A-7a-603.   Conflicting claims -- Interpleader.

If more than one person claims title to or possession of the goods, the bailee is excused from delivery until the bailee has a reasonable time to ascertain the validity of the adverse claims or to commence an action for interpleader.  The bailee may assert an interpleader either in defending an action for nondelivery of the goods or by original action.

